Rhode Island, session 2025, SB338.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Legislative Findings. The General Assembly finds and declares that:
(1) In order to promote the general welfare of the people of the state, Rhode Island must
strengthen its economy and make it more resilient over the long term in order to avoid the economic
consequences of climate change, which will require initiatives that encourage the development and
use of innovative policies, technologies and practices;
(2) Rhode Island is committed to the principles of the Paris Climate Agreement and to the
findings of the latest climate science and acknowledges that immediate actions to reduce
greenhouse gas emissions, such as those set forth in this legislation, are essential to protect our
community, our environment, and our economy;
(3) The General Assembly in 2014 enacted the Resilient Rhode Island Act, which set goals
for reducing "greenhouse gas emissions" in Rhode Island, and established affirmative obligations
to meet these statutory goals;
(4) Climate change has a disproportionate impact on low income communities,
communities of color and other vulnerable residents of Rhode Island;
(5) Climate change increases risks to public health, including from health impacts from
extreme heat events, storms and floods, decreased air quality, and illnesses transmitted from food,
water, and disease carriers, as reported by the Rhode Island department of health;
(6) Climate change increases public safety risks and threats to our private property and

public infrastructure, including risks associated with storms, floods, and sea level rise, and these
risks have been recognized by several branches of the Rhode Island government as warranting
specific attention;
(7) Climate change has severe economic consequences, including catastrophic weather
events such as Hurricane Sandy or coastal and river flooding that cause widespread damage to
communities and businesses and changes to marine ecosystems that cause severe reductions in
winter flounder, lobster, and other marine populations, and failing to address these risks will only
lead to more severe and persistent impacts upon our local economy;
(8) Rhode Island spends over three billion dollars ($3,000,000,000) annually on fossil fuels
whereas carbon pricing mechanisms have been shown to be effective in creating jobs and
stimulating the local economy;
(9) Natural gas, gasoline, diesel and heating oil prices can be highly volatile and create
uncertainty and risk for Rhode Island's economy. Reducing energy waste and demand for fossil
fuels produced out-of-state can stabilize Rhode Island's economy;
(10) In the absence of international or federal action, states cooperating regionally are
effective at reducing emissions and spurring renewable energy initiatives, as demonstrated by the
success of the Regional Greenhouse Gas Initiative (RGGI), which places a cap on emissions and
which has reduced overall emissions and strengthened the economies of participating states.
(11) Carbon pricing is a cost-effective and when used in conjunction with the emissions
cap set forth in RGGI, is an efficient market-based means to achieve significant carbon emissions
reductions;
(12) The clean energy sector has proven to be one of the fastest growing segments of Rhode
Island's economy, currently providing over fifteen thousand (15,000) jobs and growing at a rate
much higher than the overall state economy; increased investment will provide even more jobs in
addition to a higher quality of life;
(13) Climate change poses substantial risks to Rhode Island's ecology and natural
resources, and pursuant to Article 1, § 17 of the Rhode Island Constitution, it is the responsibility
of the state to secure the right of the people "to the use and enjoyment of the natural resources of
the state with due regard for the preservation of their values;" and
SECTION 2. Legislative intent. It is the intent of the general assembly to:
(1) Establish a separate restricted receipt account called the Rhode Island Economic and
Climate Resilience Climate Fund for creating employment and helping workers transition to low
carbon industries, improving energy efficiency, advancing adoption of clean energy technology,
establishing programs to safeguard low-income residents, and protecting businesses that are high
LC000465 - Page 2 of 12

energy users;
(2) Price carbon as an incentive to reduce carbon (greenhouse gas) emissions from use of
carbon-based fuels by residents and businesses in Rhode Island;
(3) Provide access to energy efficiency, energy conservation, and renewable energy
programs for low-income families and small businesses;
(4) Reduce public health, public safety, economic, and natural resource impairment risks
associated with climate change;
(5) Meet or exceed the state emissions goals for 2035 as set by the Resilient Rhode Island
Act of 2014; and
(6) Promote regional cooperation to reduce emissions, build renewable energy and energy
efficiency programs, and strengthen the economy.
SECTION 3. Title 23 of the General Laws entitled "HEALTH AND SAFETY" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 82.1
ECONOMIC AND CLIMATE RESILIENCE ACT OF 2025
23-82.1-1. Short title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Economic and Climate Resilience
Act of 2025".
23-82.1-2. Definitions.
As used in this chapter, the following words and terms shall have the following meanings
unless the context shall clearly indicate another or different meaning or intent:
(1) "Carbon dioxide equivalent" ("CO2e") means a unit of measure used to compare the
emissions from various greenhouse gases based upon their global warming potential.
(2) "Carbon price" means the fee imposed by this chapter.
(3) "Climate resilience" means the ability of a social, ecological, or socio-ecological system
and its components to anticipate, reduce, accommodate, or recover from the effects of a hazardous
event or trend in a timely and efficient manner. Such economic and social stability in the face of
climate-related disasters can be achieved through preparation, soft and hard infrastructure
improvements, emergency warning systems, and recovery resources, as well as through quickly
decarbonizing the economy to help lead other jurisdictions to do so, to avoid the worst impacts
which come with the accumulation of greenhouse gases in the atmosphere and oceans.
(4) "Commission" means the public utilities commission, set forth in § 39-1-3(a).
(5) "Electricity fuel mix" means the mix of fuels for any one-year period used to create
electricity by generators within the control area of ISO-NE.
LC000465 - Page 3 of 12

(6) "Employer" means a person, firm, corporation, partnership, association or public body,
whether for-profit or not-for-profit, that is located in Rhode Island and employs Rhode Island
residents.
(7) "Economic and climate resilience fund" means the fund established under this chapter.
(8) "Fossil fuel" means coal, oil, natural gas, propane, petroleum product, and biomass that
is not carbon neutral over its life cycle. Fossil fuels do not include renewable, carbon neutral
biomass or waste vegetable oil biodiesel.
(9) "Implementation date" means January 1 of the year following initial regional carbon
fee enactment.
(10) "Independent System Operator-New England" or "ISO-NE" means the regional
transmission organization for New England licensed by the federal energy regulatory commission
pursuant to the Federal Power Act (16 U.S.C.12).
(11) "Initial regional carbon fee enactment" means the enactment of a fee of at least five
dollars ($5.00) per metric ton of carbon by the legislatures of at least three (3) states: Rhode Island,
Massachusetts, and one or more additional states in the Regional Greenhouse Gas Initiative
(RGGI).
(12) "Low-income residential property" means a dwelling unit owned or occupied by a
household eligible to receive benefits under the low-income energy assistance program (LIHEAP)
as set forth in § 39-1-27.12; in instances where a premises contains multiple dwelling units, the
entire premises shall be considered a low-income residential property if fifty percent (50%) or more
of the dwelling units are occupied by LIHEAP-eligible households.
(13) "Person" means any individual, partnership, corporation, company, society, or
association, whether created for-profit or nonprofit purposes.
(14) "Petroleum product" means all petroleum derivatives, whether in bond or not, which
are commonly burned to produce heat, electricity, or motion or which are commonly processed to
produce synthetic gas for burning, including propane, gasoline, unleaded gasoline, kerosene,
heating oil, diesel fuel, and number 4, number 5 and residual oil for utility and non-utility uses. All
aircraft fuels (including kerosene-based jet fuel) used by commercial airplanes in Rhode Island and
all aircraft fuels brought into Quonset and Rhode Island T.F. Green International Airports are
exempt from the fee. Fuels brought into Rhode Island in airplane fuel tanks are exempt.
(15) "Resident" means a person eighteen (18) years of age or older who is a resident of
Rhode Island. All persons registered to vote in Rhode Island or all persons eighteen (18) years of
age or older who hold a valid Rhode Island driver's license or photo ID shall be presumptively
considered residents for the purposes of this chapter. Persons who do not meet the requirements for
LC000465 - Page 4 of 12

presumptive eligibility may establish eligibility by presenting other acceptable documentation.
(16) "Small business property" means the premises, whether owned or leased, of any
employer, other than a public body, that is a small business as defined by the United States Small
Business Administration (SBA).
23-82.1-3. Carbon pricing.
(a) A fee shall be collected on all non-exempt fossil fuels within the state for purposes of
distribution or use within the state, at the rate specified in subsection (b) of this section, in the
manner specified in subsections (e) through (l) of this section.
(b) Commencing on the implementation date, a fee shall be charged at a rate of fifteen
dollars ($15.00) per metric ton of CO2e that would be released by burning the fuel sold. In each
subsequent fiscal year, the rate shall be the rate of the previous fiscal year plus five dollars ($5.00),
until it reaches a rate of fifty dollars ($50.00) per ton. After the rate reaches fifty dollars ($50.00)
per ton, in each subsequent fiscal year the rate will increase in accordance with inflation, as
measured by Rhode Island's cost-of-living-adjustments calculated using the United States Bureau
of Labor Statistics Consumer Price Index or, if that index is not available, another index adopted
by the director of revenue.
(c) The director of revenue shall calculate and publish the rate in current dollars for each
year, by December 1.
(d) In sales where greenhouse gas emissions from the fossil fuels are to be permanently
sequestered and not released into the atmosphere, charges on the fossil fuels shall be reduced by
the director of revenue in proportion to the amount of CO2e that is to be sequestered. The office of
energy resources shall ensure that in such cases, the emissions are actually sequestered and not
released into the atmosphere.
(e) The fee shall be collected on all petroleum products at their first point of sale within the
state for consumption or distribution within the state.
(f) All suppliers of electricity, including all electric distribution companies operating in the
state and all competitive suppliers of electricity to end users, shall pay the fee on behalf of all of
their electricity customers on the basis of each kilowatt hour of electricity used by each distribution
customer. The per kilowatt hour fee to be paid by the supplier of electricity will be calculated in
the following manner:
(1) The fee shall be calculated on an annual basis, based on the electricity fuel mix as
defined in § 23-82.1-2.
(2) The CO2e of every kilowatt hour of electricity shall be determined by taking the
weighted average of the natural gas, coal, and oil portions of the fuel mix and multiplying each of
LC000465 - Page 5 of 12

those portions separately by the amount of CO2e emissions created per kilowatt hour of electricity
produced by each such fuel, as those carbon intensity levels are from time to time determined by
the United States Energy Information Administration (EIA).
(3) The supplier of electricity shall deduct from the fee calculated by subsections (f)(1) and
(f)(2) of this section an amount equal to the amount it paid for the same year on account of regional
greenhouse gas initiative (RGGI) clearing auctions; provided, however, that the amount so
deducted may be no greater than the total amount of the fee as calculated in subsections (f)(1) and
(f)(2) of this section. The electricity supplier shall also deduct from the fee calculated an amount
equal to the amount it may have paid for NE-GIS certificates as defined in § 39-26-2.
(g) On April 1 of each year, each supplier of electricity shall file with the commission the
result of its proposed calculation for the year beginning the following July 1. The filing will include
sufficient supporting data to enable the commission to determine whether the calculation by the
supplier of electricity was made fully in accordance with subsection (f) of this section. Upon receipt
of the calculation by the supplier of electricity, the commission shall open a docket. The sole
purpose of the docket shall be for the commission to determine whether the calculation by the
supplier of electricity was made fully in accordance with subsection (f) of this section. If the
commission determines that the calculation by the supplier of electricity was made fully in
accordance with subsection (f) of this section, the commission shall, no later than May 15 of the
same year, issue its order approving the calculation. If the commission determines that the
calculation by the supplier of electricity did not fully comply with subsection (f) of this section, the
commission shall issue an order stating clearly the errors that were made by the supplier of
electricity. In that event, the supplier of electricity shall have twenty-one (21) days to make a
compliance filing with the commission, correcting the errors identified in the commission's order.
(h) Any entity which generates more than twenty-five thousand kilowatt hours (25,000
kwh) of electricity for on-site use using any combination of one or more fossil fuels shall be
obligated to pay the carbon price, which shall be calculated by multiplying the quantity of each
separate fossil fuel combusted to produce electricity by the CO2e emissions of each separate fuel
so combusted. Within one year following the date of enactment of this chapter, the director of
revenue shall issue rules, pursuant to chapter 35 of title 42, for the regular and efficient calculation,
assessment, and collection of these carbon price amounts. Any fee already paid on said fuel
pursuant to this section shall be deducted from the fee that would otherwise be due under this
subsection.
(i) The local distribution company for natural gas shall pay the fee on behalf of all of its
distribution customers. The fee shall be calculated by multiplying the number of cubic feet of
LC000465 - Page 6 of 12

natural gas used by each customer by the amount of CO2e released by burning one cubic foot of
natural gas, as that value is from time to time determined by the United States Energy Information
Administration (EIA).
(j) The office of energy resources shall determine the amount of CO2e released in the form
of escaped methane due to the extraction, transport, or distribution of natural gas before the point
of consumption in Rhode Island, and shall add an additional charge to the carbon price for all
natural gas or natural-gas-based electricity, based on the rate specified in subsection (b) of this
section. This fee shall be published no later than December 10 of each year.
(k) In the event that a separate fee on the greenhouse gas content of transportation fuels is
established, this fee shall be deducted from the fee imposed by the economic and climate resilience
act; provided, however, that the amount so deducted may be no greater than the total amount of the
fee as calculated in subsections (f)(1) and (f)(2) of this section.
(l) Government agencies whose primary purpose is to provide public transportation by bus,
van, rail, ferry or other means that reduce the amount of driving by private motor vehicles shall be
exempt from the fees set forth in this section for the portion of their business that provides public
transport.
(m) The fee established by this chapter shall be reduced by the amount of any fee or
payment due under any federal law or under this section that sets a carbon price on the same fossil
fuels for the same year as described in this chapter; provided, however, that such reduction shall
not be in an amount of less than zero.
23-82.1-4. Economic and climate resilience fund.
(a) There is hereby established a restricted receipt account in the general fund to be known
as the economic and climate resilience fund. All fees collected under this chapter shall be deposited
in the economic and climate resilience fund.
(b) Unexpended balances and any earnings thereon shall not revert to the general fund but
shall remain solely in the economic and climate resilience fund. The economic and climate
resilience fund shall be used solely to carry out the provisions of this chapter.
(c) Proceeds from the economic and climate resilience fund may only be used for the
purposes described in § 23-82.1-5. Proceeds shall be available for the purposes described in § 23-
82.1-5 without appropriation.
(d) An independent economic and climate resilience fund oversight board shall be created,
with members chosen by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate, to include nine
(9) members with one member representing each of the following interests: small business, large
business, labor, environmental justice, scientific community, low-income, historically
LC000465 - Page 7 of 12

marginalized groups, community development organizations, and the transportation sector.
Members shall have staggered three (3) year terms. The director of the Rhode Island infrastructure
bank and the commissioner of the office of energy resources shall serve as permanent ex officio
non-voting members. The board shall elect a chair from its voting membership. The oversight board
shall convene quarterly to carry out roles pursuant to the provisions of subsection (d)(1) of this
section with the support of the office of energy resources.
(1) The economic and climate resilience fund oversight board and the office of energy
resources (OER) shall prepare and deliver an annual report to the house committee on environment
and natural resources, the senate committee on environment and agriculture, the house committee
on finance, and the senate committee on finance on or before May 1, one year after the
commencement of the fee, and annually on or before May 1 thereafter, which will:
(i) Recommend changes to the fee in order to account for greenhouse gas emissions
associated with the full lifecycle of all fossil fuels, including emissions prior and subsequent to
combustion associated with extraction, transportation, or disposal in order to help the state meet its
greenhouse gas reductions targets;
(ii) Recommend changes to the logistics of dividend distribution as currently specified in
§§ 23-82.1-5(b) and (c) in order to more fully account for equity in the needs of residents and
consumers, especially low-income residents.
(2) In addition to the revenue generated by § 23-82.1-3, the board may:
(i) Accept and administer grants from both public and private sources for the carrying out
of any of its functions, which loans or grants shall not be expended for other than the purposes for
which provided; and
(ii) Apply for, accept and expend allocations, grants and bequests of funds for the purpose
of carrying out the responsibilities of the board.
23-82.1-5. Economic and Climate Resilience Fund Uses.
(a) The Rhode Island infrastructure bank, under the auspices of the economic and climate
resilience fund oversight board pursuant to § 23-82.1-4, shall use the funds from the economic and
climate resilience fund as follows:
(1) Twenty-eight percent (28%) shall go to support climate resilience, renewable energy,
energy efficiency, climate adaptation, and low carbon transition initiatives in Rhode Island:
(i) At least one-third (1/3) of funding from the twenty-eight percent (28%) of the economic
and climate resilience fund that will be distributed to resilience and renewable energy programs
shall be distributed to neighborhoods, municipalities, groups of municipalities, or regional agencies
representing neighborhoods or municipalities whose median incomes per household are in the
LC000465 - Page 8 of 12

lowest third (1/3) of median incomes for all municipalities in the state.
(ii) For purposes of this subsection, to calculate the lowest third (1/3), the median income
of each municipality shall be weighted by the number of households in the municipality. When
possible, distribution shall prioritize assisting municipalities with existing climate action plans in
renewable energy and efficiency projects. A training session for municipal planners relating to
implementing resilience and renewable energy programs shall be a prerequisite for the
municipalities to receive funds.
(2) Thirty percent (30%) shall be used to provide direct dividends to employers in the state,
in the manner specified in subsections (b) and (d) of this section;
(3) Forty percent (40%) shall be used to provide direct dividends to residents in the state,
in the manner specified in subsections (b) and (c) of this section;
(4) Up to two percent (2%) shall be used to pay for administrative costs associated with
collecting the charges, administering the economic and climate resilience fund, and carrying out
other responsibilities assigned to the office of energy resources and department of revenue under
this chapter. Any unexpended revenue from this two percent (2%) shall be reallocated to climate
resilience and renewable energy programs, pursuant to § 23-82.1-5(a)(1). None of said proceeds
shall fund government operations or obligations other than to pay for reasonable administrative
costs in connection with the Economic and Climate Resilience Act of 2025 which should not be
higher than two percent (2%) of revenue collected. From the period commencing on the effective
date of this chapter through the implementation of the regulations necessary for the collection of
fees provided for under this chapter, the administrative allocation shall be the actual administrative
cost, and the amount of revenue directed to the climate resilience and renewable energy program
shall be reduced by the amount above two percent (2%) that is used for administrative costs.
(b) The dividends specified above shall be implemented, at the discretion of the director of
revenue, through a refundable credit added to tax returns for residents and employers that file tax
returns. For residents and employers without tax filings, dividends will be granted in the form of
direct checks. The director of revenue shall make every reasonable effort to ensure that every
resident and employer, regardless of whether or not a particular resident or employer files tax
returns or actually owes taxes, including not-for-profit organizations and government entities,
receives a dividend. Dividends will be calculated based on the estimated increased total costs of
energy in Rhode Island and distributed at the beginning of each year. The first set of dividends shall
be distributed before the implementation date based on estimated increased costs for the period of
January 1 through December 31 of that year, which may be subject to cost reconciliation based on
actual total costs by June 30 of that year.
LC000465 - Page 9 of 12

(c) The resident dividends shall be determined as follows:
(1) Fifty percent (50%) of the funds reserved for residents shall be returned in equal
amounts to residents in the state of Rhode Island whose incomes fall in the lowest one-third (1/3)
of after-tax incomes. Every resident in this one-third (1/3) shall receive an equal dividend amount.
Every resident in this one-third (1/3) who is a head of household with children or dependents under
the age of eighteen (18) shall have the dividend increased based on the number of children or
dependents under the age of eighteen (18) in residence, with each child adding the value of one
equal dividend amount.
(2) Thirty-five percent (35%) of the funds reserved for residents shall be returned in equal
amounts to residents in the state of Rhode Island whose incomes fall in the middle one-third (1/3)
of after-tax incomes. Every resident in this one-third (1/3) shall receive an equal dividend amount.
Every resident in this one-third (1/3) who is a head of household with children or dependents under
the age of eighteen (18) shall have the dividend increased based on the number of children or
dependents under the age of eighteen (18) in residence, with each child adding the value of one
equal dividend amount.
(3) Fifteen percent (15%) of the funds reserved for residents shall be returned in equal
amounts to residents in the state of Rhode Island whose incomes fall in the top one-third (1/3) of
after-tax incomes. Every resident in this one-third (1/3) shall receive an equal dividend amount.
Every resident in this one-third (1/3) who is a head of household with children or dependents under
the age of eighteen (18) shall have the dividend increased based on the number of children or
dependents under the age of eighteen (18) in residence, with each child adding the value of one
equal dividend amount.
(d) The employer dividends shall be determined as follows:
(1) Seventy percent (70%) of the funds reserved for employers shall be distributed to
employers in an amount proportional, in terms of full-time equivalent employees, to the employer's
share of total employment in the state.
(2) Thirty (30%) of the funds reserved for employers shall be additionally distributed to
employers identified by the office of energy resources as energy intensive, trade exposed, or most
vulnerable to fuel cost increases, which employers shall include, but not be limited to, the fishing
and agriculture industries.
(e) Residents and businesses will be given the option to opt out of receiving all or part of
their dividend payment to allow assistance to low-income residents so they do not experience
increased energy costs.
(f) The director of revenue shall issue a public report, submitted to the governor, the
LC000465 - Page 10 of 12

speaker of the house, and the senate president, by December 31 of each year commencing with
2026, stating the expenditures from the economic and climate resilience fund for the most recently
completed fiscal year and plans to distribute the balance remaining in the fund, if any.
23-82.1-6. Promulgation of rules.
The department of revenue, office of energy resources, and any other state agency or
instrumentality designated by this chapter or by the director of administration to perform functions
or duties to effectuate the purposes and functions of this chapter are hereby authorized to adopt, in
accordance with the provisions of chapter 35 of title 42, administer, and enforce any rules necessary
or convenient to carry out the purposes of this chapter.
23-82.1-7. Implementation.
The implementation of the provisions of this chapter shall commence upon initial regional
carbon fee enactment.
SECTION 4. This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
========
LC000465
========
LC000465 - Page 11 of 12